Alabama, session 2026rs, HB509.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) In a civil action for damages for
personal injury, wrongful death, or property damage, a party
to the action shall be entitled to an affirmative defense if
the party establishes that the personal injury, wrongful
death, or property damage was sustained by an individual who
willfully obstructed the free, convenient, and normal use of
Page 1

willfully obstructed the free, convenient, and normal use of
HB509 INTRODUCED
any public street, highway, bridge, or road by doing any of
the following:
(1) Impeding, hindering, stifling, or restraining
traffic or passage on the street, highway, bridge, or road.
(2) Standing on or remaining in the street, highway,
bridge, or road.
(3) Endangering the safe movement of vehicles or
pedestrians traveling on the street, highway, bridge, or road.
(b) In a civil action in which a defendant raises an
affirmative defense under this section, the court, on motion
by the defendant, shall stay the action during the pendency of
any criminal action the factual basis of which forms the
factual basis for the defense.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2